Other/Precision Software/Precision Lang Suite/Editor/Extras/Hunspell/Dictionaries/gl.aff
SET ISO8859-1
TRY áéíóúesianrtolcdugmphbfvñ
# COMPOUNDMIN 3
# COMPOUNDFLAG N

PFX U Y 1
PFX U   0    sub          [^bhr]

PFX S Y 3
PFX S   h    des          h
PFX S   0    des          [^hs]
PFX S   0    de           s

PFX R Y 1
PFX R   0    re           .

PFX I Y 4
PFX I   0    ir           r
PFX I   0    in           [^lmpr]
PFX I   0    im           p
PFX I   0    i            [lm]

PFX B Y 1
PFX B   0    anti-        .

PFX A Y 1
PFX A   0    anti         .

SFX z N 10
SFX z   o    iños         o
SFX z   o    iño          o
SFX z   o    iñas         o
SFX z   o    iña          o
SFX z   e    iños         e
SFX z   e    iño          e
SFX z   e    iñas         e
SFX z   e    iña          e
SFX z   0    iños         l
SFX z   0    iño          l

SFX y Y 4
SFX y   o    eiros        o
SFX y   o    eiro         o
SFX y   a    eiras        a
SFX y   a    eira         a

SFX x Y 4
SFX x   r    delas        [ai]r
SFX x   r    dela         [ai]r
SFX x   er   idelas       er
SFX x   er   idela        er

SFX w Y 8
SFX w   a    osos         a
SFX w   a    oso          a
SFX w   a    osas         a
SFX w   a    osa          a
SFX w   0    sos          o
SFX w   0    so           o
SFX w   0    sas          o
SFX w   0    sa           o

SFX v Y 6
SFX v   ir   íbel         ir
SFX v   ir   íbeis        ir
SFX v   er   íbel         er
SFX v   er   íbeis        er
SFX v   ar   ábel         ar
SFX v   ar   ábeis        ar

SFX t Y 18
SFX t   zo   cistas       zo
SFX t   zo   cista        zo
SFX t   za   cistas       za
SFX t   za   cista        za
SFX t   o    istas        [^cz]o
SFX t   o    ista         [^cz]o
SFX t   e    istas        e
SFX t   e    ista         e
SFX t   co   quistas      co
SFX t   co   quista       co
SFX t   a    uistas       ga
SFX t   a    uista        ga
SFX t   a    stas         ia
SFX t   a    sta          ia
SFX t   a    istas        [^giz]a
SFX t   a    ista         [^giz]a
SFX t   0    istas        [lr]
SFX t   0    ista         [lr]

SFX s Y 32
SFX s   és   esísimos     és
SFX s   és   esísimo      és
SFX s   és   esísimas     és
SFX s   és   esísima      és
SFX s   zo   císimos      zo
SFX s   zo   císimo       zo
SFX s   zo   císimas      zo
SFX s   zo   císima       zo
SFX s   z    císimos      z
SFX s   z    císimo       z
SFX s   z    císimas      z
SFX s   z    císima       z
SFX s   o    ísimos       [^cgz]o
SFX s   o    ísimo        [^cgz]o
SFX s   o    ísimas       [^cgz]o
SFX s   o    ísima        [^cgz]o
SFX s   o    uísimos      go
SFX s   o    uísimo       go
SFX s   o    uísimas      go
SFX s   o    uísima       go
SFX s   e    ísimos       e
SFX s   e    ísimo        e
SFX s   e    ísimas       e
SFX s   e    ísima        e
SFX s   co   quísimos     co
SFX s   co   quísimo      co
SFX s   co   quísimas     co
SFX s   co   quísima      co
SFX s   0    ísimos       [lr]
SFX s   0    ísimo        [lr]
SFX s   0    ísimas       [lr]
SFX s   0    ísima        [lr]

SFX p Y 12
SFX p   és   eses         és
SFX p   ás   ases         ás
SFX p   z    ces          z
SFX p   ol   óis          ol
SFX p   m    ns           m
SFX p   l    s            il
SFX p   l    is           [au]l
SFX p   l    is           [áéíóú]bel
SFX p   el   éis          [^b]el
SFX p   0    s            [^lmrsz]
SFX p   0    es           r
SFX p   0    es           [^áé]s

SFX o Y 4
SFX o   r    zóns         [aei]r
SFX o   r    zón          [aei]r
SFX o   r    sizóns       or
SFX o   r    sizón        or

SFX n Y 6
SFX n   r    ntes         [ae]r
SFX n   r    nte          [ae]r
SFX n   r    nentes       or
SFX n   r    nente        or
SFX n   ir   entes        ir
SFX n   ir   ente         ir

SFX m Y 4
SFX m   íbel ibelmente    íbel
SFX m   ábel abelmente    ábel
SFX m   o    amente       o
SFX m   0    mente        [^b][^n~][^o]

SFX i Y 10
SFX i   és   esismo       és
SFX i   zo   cismo        zo
SFX i   o    ismo         [^cz]o
SFX i   ga   guismo       ga
SFX i   e    ismo         e
SFX i   co   quismo       co
SFX i   ca   quismo       ca
SFX i   a    smo          ia
SFX i   a    ismo         [^cgi]a
SFX i   0    ismo         [lr]

SFX h Y 36
SFX h   ú    uciños       ú
SFX h   ú    uciño        ú
SFX h   ó    oiño         ó
SFX h   ó    iños         ó
SFX h   és   esiños       és
SFX h   és   esiño        és
SFX h   é    eiños        é
SFX h   é    eiño         é
SFX h   á    aiñas        á
SFX h   á    aiña         á
SFX h   zo   ciños        zo
SFX h   zo   ciño         zo
SFX h   za   ciñas        za
SFX h   za   ciña         za
SFX h   z    ciños        z
SFX h   z    ciño         z
SFX h   o    uiños        go
SFX h   o    uiño         go
SFX h   o    iños         [^cgiz]o
SFX h   o    iño          [^cgiz]o
SFX h   e    iños         e
SFX h   e    iño          e
SFX h   co   quiños       co
SFX h   co   quiño        co
SFX h   ca   quiñas       ca
SFX h   ca   quiña        ca
SFX h   a    uiñas        ga
SFX h   a    uiña         ga
SFX h   a    iñas         [^gz]a
SFX h   a    iña          [^gz]a
SFX h   0    iños         l
SFX h   0    iños         [^é]s
SFX h   0    iño          l
SFX h   0    iño          [^e]s
SFX h   0    ciños        [inru]
SFX h   0    ciño         [inru]

SFX f Y 14
SFX f   ón   oas          ón
SFX f   ón   oa           ón
SFX f   és   esas         és
SFX f   és   esa          és
SFX f   o    as           o
SFX f   o    a            o
SFX f   n    s            án
SFX f   án   á            án
SFX f   ao   ás           ao
SFX f   ao   á            ao
SFX f   0    as           or
SFX f   0    as           [^e]s
SFX f   0    a            or
SFX f   0    a            [^e]s

SFX d Y 12
SFX d   íbel ibilidade    íbel
SFX d   ábel abilidade    ábel
SFX d   zo   cidade       zo
SFX d   z    cidade       z
SFX d   o    üidades      go
SFX d   o    üidade       go
SFX d   o    idade        [^gz]o
SFX d   o    idade        [^gz]o
SFX d   e    idade        e
SFX d   0    idades       [^b][^n~]l
SFX d   0    idade        r
SFX d   0    idade        [^b][^n~]l

SFX c Y 6
SFX c   r    sición       por
SFX c   r    sicións      por
SFX c   r    cións        [ae]r
SFX c   r    cións        [^x]ir
SFX c   r    ción         [ae]r
SFX c   r    ción         [^x]ir

SFX b Y 8
SFX b   ón   onas         ón
SFX b   ón   ona          ón
SFX b   án   anas         án
SFX b   án   ana          án
SFX b   tor  triz         tor
SFX b   tor  trices       tor
SFX b   dor  triz         dor
SFX b   dor  trices       dor

SFX a Y 1
SFX a   il   eis          il
