Other/Precision Software/Precision Lang Suite/Editor/Extras/Hunspell/Dictionaries/gl.dic
aprobaban/S
asimilar/vcYXnDp
inaugurar/c
botas/pS
burro/fph
calculamos/R
caldo/yfp
ciclone/pA
cidades/I
cindia/p
cine/pi
circunscribir/vYXnp
claudicar/nYXpc
clásica/Ap
coagulante/pA
complexo/pfd
comunismo/A
conciliaran/R
confiro/f
copular/YXDpo
cristianismo/A
cuantitativo/mfp
cuspir/YDxp
definido/Ip
depor/Kpc
detrair/YXv
dirixirán/U
embazar/xYXnMp
embrazada/y
empregaren/SU
emprega/pUS
enviar/YXRp
ermitán/bp
escrutar/YXDpv
espanta/wp
espreitar/YxXDnp
estatal/tp
excesivo/mpf
exinanir/YXpo
extremo/fp
fanega/hp
febril/pA
feroz/spd
flexíbel/Rdp
forman/RI
fugaz/pds
gadaño/fy
gula/pR
hexemonia/tp
horripilar/pnYXDo
imbécil/a
implantar/c
imputar/YXvp
individual/dpmi
inspección/bp
inviolábel/pd
lento/fmp
louvamiña/yp
mallar/YXDxp
mancomunar/YXop
mido/Sf
ministran/U
mola/Ip
normal/spm
notábel/m
obrar/YXnp
observar/cYXp
oriental/tpi
pano/fhp
parlamentar/YXoitp
parta/pRI
patuxa/yp
pedichón/pb
pena/wyp
perverso/pf
pobre/zp
poderoso/psf
pombo/zpf
predeterminar/pYXo
profundo/pfd
propagar/YvXpc
provén/S
proxectil/a
radia/Ip
ranza/wp
raza/tp
real/Idmp
renuir/YXn
rá/h
sebo/wp
semita/ip
sermón/bp
situar/pYXc
sobrecarregas/p
tosir/pYx
trairei/UR
transformar/YXonDp
ultimo/mf
universal/tidpm
usuário/pf
utilizase/I
vendeche/R
xeito/wp
xorda/yp
abo/i
abouxar/nYXDp
acender/vpYXDM
adaptado/Ip
reafirmar/o
alape/p
alegar/pcYX
aludir/YXDpv
anel/zp
anfitrión/pb
animal/zp
antevia/tp
apareza/RpS
arrastar/xYXDvpM
axir/YRnXp
boneco/hpf
bérber/s
búlgaro/pf
recair/YXMx
canónico/fAp
capacitá/RI
caro/dpzf
cava/yp
cavila/pw
cesíbel/dp
cobrei/R
colonizai/S
colorir/vYXp
confirmar/cYXDnp
confortábel/mp
contratedes/U
cristao/pfA
do/t
demo/h
desce/p
destituir/YXo
diarreico/Apf
dimensión/bp
disciplino/If
doce/sp
doer/YXpn
durar/pYXc
empreguemos/SU
enleen/S
entrevia/tp
etimolóxico/fAp
evasivo/fp
existencial/tip
fantasia/wtp
reflexión/b
franquear/vYXp
fungar/xYXp
gabión/pb
galega/pti
guio/yf
hábil/a
húmido/fdp
idear/oYXp
imediatez/p
imprimirán/R
incuestionábel/mp
internacional/pti
irrigar/vYXDpc
larpar/pYXx
limitado/Ip
luso/iItpf
matón/pb
merenda/ph
meso/zfRp
ministrades/U
modo/tfp
mordaz/sdp
motorizar/oYXp
muco/wp
narrar/vpYXc
octosílabo/fp
oportuno/itdpf
ordena/SpR
repartida/y
percutirán/R
perseverar/YXpn
replantar/o
polimorfo/ifp
posuído/Sp
presuntivo/pmf
pronunciábel/Ip
proporción/bp
prostituir/YDXov
provocar/YDncXp
queimar/YXMnxop
ramo/tpf
rapaza/ph
resina/wp
reversíbel/pd
sazón/bp
selectivo/mpf
servir/YDvnp
sindical/tpi
suposto/m
tenaz/psd
territorial/pd
tinxan/S
trairia/URp
tramitar/YXpvo
trimestre/p
utilizaba/Ip
vasoira/yp
visar/RYpX
visíbel/Ipmd
xordo/fpz
zapato/yhpf
zorregar/YXxp
abazo/tf
abonda/pw
afortalo/f
alto/spf
alucinar/YXDncp
amar/nYXDpv
anteceder/nYXp
apreciábel/m
argumento/tfp
audácia/p
axeitar/YXxpM
baixo/spzf
caen/SR
caloteiro/ipf
cama/ph
caso/ypf
compilai/R
compostelán/bpf
comuniquen/I
conformo/ftid
constitucional/ImpA
contrataria/Up
curtir/vYXMDpc
designar/YXpc
desnutrir/o
difícil/pa
divido/Uf
divide/Up
documental/mp
dese/t
económico/pAf
empurrón/hp
encadeai/S
entoxo/p
estrelecer/nYpX
estrondo/wp
fermoso/spf
gato/zpRh
gosta/wp
impinxir/YXpx
indescriptíbel/pm
iniciá/R
levamos/U
liberal/tdpi
louro/ypf
louvar/pYXMDv
marisco/fp
matricula/p
moeda/ph
montaña/iwyp
moral/dIp
mune/Ip
nutre/pS
palpitar/nYXop
patriota/pi
pillabán/bp
por/IKcURp
praga/ph
pugnai/RI
radiar/ncYXDp
rama/py
regredir/pYKv
regular/McYXDpdm
relaxar/pYXo
runfar/YDxXp
sagaz/spd
saro/f
surxan/IR
símil/a
tinxir/pYXDSv
tirapuxa/yp
titule/Up
tormento/wp
totalizar/YXop
trombeta/tp
térmica/Ap
vagara/w
vergoña/wp
verté/RU
vital/dp
xeran/R
xograr/hp
abalroar/xoYXDMp
abater/XYDpM
abrir/xnYXDvMp
inaceitábel/m
acelerador/b
active/tpid
adaptar/YXSRDvpc
adubo/yf
agrido/f
artellai/S
barroco/siptf
bicar/YXDxp
bolo/zRp
capital/pi
carapucha/ph
casual/ptdi
incitar/nMDv
cocé/R
colección/bp
comarcal/p
compatíbel/dIp
comunicamos/I
conceptivo/pfA
contender/vYXnDp
cooperar/YXcp
dado/shfp
decapitar/YXop
democracia/Ap
dirixiche/U
discreto/fpI
económica/pA
enganando/S
eximir/nYpXv
extrapolas/p
fillo/pzf
formal/mdp
francés/sifph
fácil/a
gaiola/yp
gal/zi
incorporar/YXRpc
inflamar/YXpc
ironia/tp
irreal/tIidmp
irruptivo/pf
labrego/zpf
legal/mdp
levache/U
leña/wp
macizo/spf
mención/bp
ministrado/Up
neurose/p
nutrir/SYpX
orfo/zpf
pedi/IS
pedra/yp
peneirar/pYXDxM
peregrinar/YXpo
plural/tpidm
polpa/wp
prevalecer/nYXp
principal/pm
producian/R
provisión/pb
páxaro/hp
quebrar/noYXMpx
queixumeiro/fp
racional/pIdtim
sangue/zp
semellas/p
sovar/SpYX
suxo/pdf
terror/tpi
titulan/U
transformo/tif
travada/y
travar/YXDMxp
urdir/YpMDvX
vadian/I
vibrar/YXDop
voraz/spd
áxil/a
abelido/f
abella/wyph
aclarar/YXMDpc
adquirin/R
adstrinxir/pYXn
adube/p
alemán/bpf
arranxastes/S
azul/zp
banana/py
braga/ph
canceroso/Apf
carreiro/zf
clave/sp
clicar/vYXp
combinado/m
compreensíbel/mpI
conferir/ZYDnvp
consolido/f
construía/Rp
contextualizan/S
contrataban/U
conxugal/Ap
corporativo/pfi
cousa/ph
criativo/dfp
cívico/Apf
decisión/Ip
decompor/Kop
denegar/YXpc
dirixiria/Up
distorsión/bp
ecoloxia/tp
eficaz/sImp
estremar/YXxvp
estética/pA
exceder/pYXn
filosófica/pA
fouce/pz
fumo/f
gabo/fy
imediato/pfm
inovar/YXDpc
interpreta/pR
irian/U
marcou/RS
meigo/szpf
mirrar/YXDpo
mofa/wp
mísil/a
natural/tspidm
ofensivo/pfI
patuxo/fy
persecutório/pf
picara/h
pleitear/pYX
pontual/pm
pouco/szpf
profanar/oYXp
puro/mfptdi
quentará/Rp
querelar/YXDnp
quixeche/S
reivindicar/cYXDvp
remunerar/YXpc
riscar/YXpx
saibro/w
santo/zpfd
solúbel/RpI
suxestión/pb
traísen/UR
tranquilo/pdmf
trixésimo/pf
usufruir/YXDo
vindo/pyf
vivaz/spd
xanelo/fzp
xeral/dtpm
zugar/pYXxM
útil/aI
